Massachusetts, session 194th, S209.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 87A1/2 of Chapter 112, is hereby amended by striking subsection (e)
and adding the following:
“(e) The educational and experience requirement for a certificate shall be one of the
following:
(i) a bachelor’s degree or its equivalent from a college or university approved by the
board and two years of full-time experience, or the equivalent approved by the board
(ii) a bachelor’s degree with 30 semester hours of additional education from a college or
university approved by the board and one of full-time experience, or the equivalent approved by
the board
(iii) a master’s degree or its equivalent from a college or university approved by the
board, and one year of full-time experience, or the equivalent approved by the board”
of 3

Section 2. Section 87A1/2 of Chapter 112, is hereby amended by adding in the following
after subsection (e):
“(f) Educational requirements to take the uniform CPA examination shall be set forth in
regulations promulgated by the board.”
Section 3. Section 87A1/2 of Chapter 112, is hereby amended by striking the (f) and
amending it to: “(g)”.
Section 4. Section 87A1/2 of Chapter 112, is hereby amended by striking the (g) and
amending it to: “(h)”.
Section 5. Section 87A1/2 of Chapter 112, is hereby amended by striking the (h) and
amending it to: “(j)”.
Section 6. Section 87B of Chapter 112, is hereby amended by striking out (A), (B) and
(C) and replacing them with the following after the wording, “(2) The applicant”:
“is certified or licensed and is in good standing; has passed the unform CPA examination
and has completed the education requirements listed in subsection (e) in Section 87A1/2 of
Chapter 112.
Section 7. Section 87B of Chapter 112, is hereby amended in subsection (h)(2) by
striking out the following language:
“any state which the National Qualification Appraisal Service of the National Association
of State Boards of Accountancy, hereinafter referred to as the NASBA, has verified to be in
substantial equivalence with the certified public accountant licensure requirements of the
Uniform Accountancy Act published jointly by the NASBA and the American Institute of
of 3

Certified Public Accountants, hereinafter referred to as the AICPA, if such state has adopted and
implemented a 150 hour educational requirement as a qualification for initial licensure as a
certified public accountant; or (ii) a valid license as a certified public accountant issued by any
state which the National Qualification Appraisal Service of the NASBA has not verified to be in
substantial equivalence with the certified public accountant licensure requirements of the
AICPA/NASBA Uniform Accountancy Act, if such person has obtained, from the National
Qualification Appraisal Service of the NASBA, verification that such person's certified public
accountant qualifications are substantially equivalent to the certified public accountant licensure
requirements of the AICPA/NASBA Uniform Accountancy Act;” and replacing it with the
following language after the wording, “valid license as a certified public accountant issued”:
“any other state. provided that the individual has met the education and experience
requirements listed in subsection (e) of 87A1/2 of Chapter 112 and has passed the Uniform
Certified Public Accountant Examination or exceed the licensure requirements of this chapter or
approved by the board.; Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no notice or other
submission shall be required by any individual who offers or renders professional services under
this section, whether in person or by mail, telephone, or electronic means. An individual who
practices in this state pursuant to this section consents, as a condition of the grant of such
practice privilege: to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the
Board; to comply with this Act and the Board’s rules; that in the event the individual’s license
from the other state is no longer valid, the individual will cease offering or rendering
professional services in this state individually or on behalf of a firm.”
Section 8. Sections 1-6 in this act shall take effect on January 1, 2026, and apply on or
after this date. Section 7 in this act shall take effect immediately upon its approval.
of 3